Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-165
Enforcement of order; modification; when.

An order entered pursuant to section 43-163 may be enforced by a civil action, and the prevailing party may be awarded, as part of the costs of the action, reasonable attorney's fees. The court shall not modify an order issued under such section unless it finds that the modification is necessary to serve the best interests of the adoptee and (1) that the modification is agreed to by the adoptive parent or parents and the birth parent or parents or (2) exceptional circumstances have arisen since the order was entered that justify modification of the order.

Laws 1993, LB 205, § 11.